src/fst/morphology/stems/adverbs.lexc
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@uit.no or feedback@divvun.no
!
! NB: through June 2019, J. Wilbur's development work made possible by Deutsche Forschungsgemeinschaft (grant 286335341)

!! Adverbs

LEXICON adv   !!= * **@CODE@** adds the tag +Adv
+Adv: ENDLEX ;

LEXICON Adverb   !!= * **@CODE@** is the list
agev adv ;
aj adv "också" ;
aj+Use/NG:áj adv "också" ;
aj+Use/NG:ájaj adv "också" ;
ájjve adv ;
ájmon adv;
aktan adv "together" ;
alás adv "åt väster" ;
alebuj adv "längre mot väster" ;
alebun adv "i längre mot väster" ;
alelt adv "i väster" ;
állbet adv "cheaply" ;
allagit adv "high(ly)" ;
allela adv "längs västra sidan av" ;
allelij adv "västerut" ;
allelis adv "västerifrån" ;
allen adv "i väster" ;
allelin adv "i väster" ;
allet adv "från väster" ;
almatjláhkáj:almatjláhkáj adv "humanlike" ;
alvos adv ;
alvosláhkáj adv "frighteningly" ;
árabut adv ;
árgan adv ;
áramusat adv ;
arrvogisláhkáj adv "in a worthy way" ;
árradis adv "in the morning" ;

baddjen adv "up" ;
baddjen+Use/NG:bajjen adv "up" ;
badjelt adv "above, over" ;
badjelt+Use/NG:bajjelt adv "above, over" ;
badjel adv "above, over" ;
badjel+Use/NG:bajjel adv "above, over" ;
bajep adv "farther above, farther over" ;
bajás adv ;
bálldalugguj adv ;
bär adv "only" ;
bär+Use/NG:ber adv "only" ;
bär+Use/NG:bar adv "only" ;
beru adv ;
!biejven adv ;
bihko adv ;
binnat adv ;
birraskin adv "around here" ;
buadtsot adv "nakedly" ;
buohta adv ;
buoragit+Use/NG:buoragijt adv "well" ;
buoragit adv "well" ;
buorebut adv ;
buorebuttjat adv ;
båjtot adv "fel,oriktigt" ;
båsstot adv "fel,oriktigt" ;

del adv "tydligen" ;
del+Use/NG:däl adv "tydligen" ;
dájjva adv "often, now and then" ;
dájjva+Use/NG:dájjvaj adv "often, now and then" ;
dájna adv ;
dalá adv "immediately, directly" ;
dalá+Use/NG:dalák adv ;
dalá+Use/NG:dalának adv ;
dálatjláhkáj adv "in a modern way" ;
dále adv "here; now" ;
dále+Use/NG:dál adv "here; now" ;
dale adv "there; then" ;
dåle adv "yonder; long ago" ;
dalloj adv "then, that time" ;
dallotjist adv "from back then" ;
dálloj adv ;
dállotjist adv ;
danen adv "därför" ;
danne adv "there" ;
dánne adv "here" ;
darajk adv "until" ;
dunne adv "yonder" ;
dábben adv "here, at this place" ;
dabben adv "there, at that place" ;
dábbest adv "from here" ;
dávk adv "förmodligen, i alla fall" ;
dehki adv "towards here" ;
dehki+Use/NG:dehk adv "towards here" ;
diedon adv ;
dievva adv ;
dijbmá adv "last year" ;
dis adv "med negation inte längre" ;
disste adv "med negation inte längre" ;
duggu adv ;
duhku adv "towards yonder" ;
duhku+Use/NG:duhk adv "towards yonder" ;
dule adv "over there" ;
duolla adv ;
duolloj adv ;
dubbebun adv "farther away" ;
dubben adv ;
dubbelist adv "from over there" ;
dulutjláhkáj adv "like in the old days" ;
dåbbelt adv ;
dålen adv ;
dåbben adv "yonder" ;
dåbbe adv "där borta" ;
dåhkå adv "to there; dit" ;
dåhkå+Use/NG:dåhk adv "to there; dit" ;
dårást adv "off to the side" ;

edisik adv ;
erit adv ;
erida adv "away, bort" ;

färrtláhkáj adv "in every way" ;

gáddek adv ;
gájk adv "allra; most of all" ;
gájk+Use/NG:gajk adv "allra; most of all" ;
garrasit adv "hard, solidly, stiffly" ;
gasskat adv ;
gien adv "either" ; !"neither"?
gien+Use/NG:gienak adv "either" ; !"neither"?
gidda adv "all the way" ;
gidda+Use/NG:git adv "all the way" ;
gievrasláhkáj adv "strongly, powerfully" ;
gilluk adv "alone" ;
guggu adv "vart, till vilken plats" ;
guhkás adv ;
!guhkebuj adv "towards farther away" ; !actually a adj+Case (ill.sg) with adverbial semantics
guhkebut adv "farther away" ;
!guhkev adv "a long time" ; !removed because acutally Adj+acc.sg usually with a sentence adverbial function
gukkte adv "hur, på vilket sätt" ;
gukkte+Use/NG:gåk adv "how" ;
gukkte+Use/NG:gåkt adv "how" ;
gukkte+Use/NG:gåkkte adv "how" ;
guktes adv "hur" ;
gunik adv "like" ;
gunik+Use/NG:gunuk adv "like" ;
gunne adv "var, på/i den plats där" ;
gusa adv "vart, till vilken plats" ;
guse adv "vart, till vilken plats" ;
gusi adv "vart, till vilken plats" ;
gusste adv "varifrån, från vilken plats" ;
gåbbelij adv "till vilkendera sidan av" ;
gåbbelin adv "på vilkendera sidan" ;
gåbbelist adv "från vilkendera sidan om" ;
gågŋåt adv ;
gåktå adv "hur" ;
gånne adv "hur, på/ i den plats där" ;
gånnå adv "var, på/i den plats där" ;
gåsse adv "när, vid vilken tidpunkt" ;
gåsså adv "när, vid vilken tidpunkt" ;
gåssek adv ;
gåsstås adv "varifrån" ;

hállva adv "almost" ;
hähkkat adv ;

ihkip adv "maybe" ;
ihkip+Use/NG:igip adv "maybe" ;
iemeláhkáj adv "in the usual way" ;
ietjáláhkáj adv "differently" ;
ilá adv ;
ihkenis adv "som helst" ;
ihkenas adv "som helst" ;
iednagit adv ;
iednak adv "much" ;
iehkedis adv "in the evening" ;
ikktij adv "together" ;
ekktu adv "yesterday" ;
ekktu+Use/NG:ikktu adv "yesterday" ;
ekktu+Use/NG:ukktu adv "yesterday" ;
iktuk adv "ensam" ;
iktuk+Use/NG:uktuk adv "ensam" ;
iktuk+Use/NG:uktu adv "ensam" ;
ienabut adv "more" ;

juo adv "already; jo" ;
jámas adv "deadly, fatally" ;
jasska adv ;
jis adv "conversely";

kano adv "maybe" ;
kano+Use/NG:kan adv "maybe" ;

lahka adv ;
lukksa adv "österut" ;
luksaårjás adv "mot sydost" ;
lulás adv "mot öster" ;
lules adv "mot öster" ;
luldne adv "i öster" ;
lulebuj adv "längre mot öster" ;
lulebun adv "längre i öster" ;
lullde adv "från öster" ;
lullela adv "längs östra sidan" ;
lullelatjan adv "lite östligare" ;
lullelij adv "längre mot öster" ;
lullelin adv "i öster" ;
lullelis adv "från öster om" ;
lulelt adv "österifrån" ;
luoboj adv "utspridd, löst" ;

makktes adv "hur, på vilket sätt" ;
makktes+Use/NG:maktes adv "hur, på vilket sätt" ;
manen adv "varför, till vad, såsom var" ; !essiv av mij
man adv "how" ; !actually an interr-adv
maŋŋelin adv ;
maŋŋel adv ;
maŋelt adv ;
maŋep adv "next" ;
maŋen adv "along with; anbei";
marje adv "possibly, perhaps" ;
maŋemus adv "lastly, finally" ;
maŋemus+Use/NG:miŋimus adv "lastly, finally" ;
mudin adv "sometimes" ;
mudin+Use/NG:muhtin adv "sometimes" ;
mudin+Use/NG:mudiŋ adv "sometimes" ;
muhtemláhkáj adv "partly" ;
mäddel adv "förbi" ;
måddeláhkáj adv "many ways" ;

nanne adv "on, on top of" ;
nanne+Use/NG:naldne adv "on, on top of" ;
nav adv ;
nav+Use/NG:nåv adv ;
navte adv ;
navte+Use/NG:nåvte adv ;
navte+Use/NG:navt adv ;
navte+Use/NG:nåvt adv ;
navte+Use/NG:nuvt adv ;
nievresláhkáj adv "badly" ;
njuallga adv "rakt" ;
nuortas adv "mot norr" ;
nuortasalás adv "mot nordväst" ;
nuortasluksa adv "mot nordost" ;
nuarrtaallet adv "från nordväst" ;
nuarrtal adv "norr om" ;
nuarrtalij adv "norrut" ;
nuarrtalin adv "på norra sidan" ;
nuarrtalis adv "från norra sidan" ;
nuarrtal+Use/NG:nuärrtal adv "norr om" ;
nuarrtalij+Use/NG:nuärrtalij adv "norrut" ;
nuarrtalin+Use/NG:nuärrtalin adv "på norra sidan" ;
nuarrtalis+Use/NG:nuärrtalis adv "från norra sidan" ;
nuarrtalullet adv "från nordost" ;
nuarrtan adv "i norr" ;
nuarrtat adv "från norr" ;

rassta adv ;
rastá adv ;
ruapptot adv ;
ruptujt adv "tillbaka" ;
ruptujt+Use/NG:ruptujd adv "tillbaka" ;
ruapptolij adv "towards the back" ;
ruvva adv ;
ruvva+Use/NG:ruvvaj adv ;
räkkta adv ;
riekta adv ;

sagga adv "intensely; häftigt" ;
sämmáláhkáj adv "in the same way" ;
sämmáláhkáj+Use/NG:sammáláhkáj adv "in the same way" ;
!sieldes adv "terribly, incredibly" ; !check for examples in corpus!
sierra adv "specially, differently, separately" ;
särra adv ;
sierrot adv ;
sisa adv ;
sissŋelij adv ;
sjávot adv ;
sjávo adv ;
spájjta adv "quickly" ;
spájtabut adv "more quickly" ;
suajbma adv "slowly" ;
suojmat adv "slowly" ;
suojmatjij adv "slowly" ; !check pos, -tj- = DIM?
så adv ;

tjábbagit adv "beautifully; carefully" ;
tjara adv ;
tjara+Use/NG:tjada adv ;
tjiegŋalit adv ;
tjällga adv "clearly" ;
tjåhken adv "together (iness)" ;
tjåhkkáj adv "together (ill)" ;
tjårrgå adv ;

ujtu adv "of course, naturally, actually" ;
ujtu+Use/NG:ujt adv ;
uddni adv ;
uddnik adv ;
udiehtelesláhkáj:u#diehtelesláhkáj adv "unknown, mysteriously" ;
ullgulin adv "ute" ;
ullgulist adv "utifrån" ;
ullgun adv ;
ulgus adv ;
ullu adv "väldigt" ;
umasláhkáj adv "all ways" ;
unnátjij adv "a little bit" ;
uvdutjláhkáj adv "like in the old days" ;

vajku adv "although";
val adv "but" ; !cognate with CC vala ??
vastet adv "terribly" ;
várrogit adv "carefully" ;
vehis adv ;
viehka adv ;
vierabut adv ;
vide adv "åter, igen" ;
vide+Use/NG:vit adv "åter, igen" ;
vijjdábut adv "further" ;
vijjdáj adv "far and wide" ;
vijjku adv "although" ;
vijmak adv "finally, eventually" ;
vist adv "åter, igen" ;
vistik adv "åter, igen" ;
vis adv "återigen" ;
vulus adv ;
vuolebuj adv ;
vuolebun adv ;
vuolen adv ;
vuostak adv "firstly" ;
vuällelin adv ;
vuällen adv ;
väjjto adv "free (-range)" ;
vällot adv "horizontally" ;

åbbat adv "certainly, surely" ;
åbå adv ;
åbå+Use/NG:åbbå adv ;
åbbånis adv "med negering ..alls" ;
ållå adv "completely, entirely" ;
ållást adv "completely, entirely" ;
ållgon adv ;
ållgolin adv ;
ållgolist adv ;
ånegisláhkáj adv "briefly, succinctly" ;
årjás adv "åt söder" ;
årjebuj adv "längre åt söder" ;
årjebun adv "i längre söderut" ;
årjebus adv "längre söderifrån" ;
årjelt adv "längs södra sidan" ;
årját adv "från söder" ;
årrjan adv "i söder, söderut" ;
årrjealás adv "mot sydväst" ;
årrjela adv "längs södra sidan av" ;
årrjelatjan adv "lite söder om" ;
årrjelij adv "söderut, riktning mot söder" ;
årrjelin adv "riktning i söder" ;
årrjelis adv "riktning från söder" ;
årrjelulás adv "mot sydost" ;
årrjelullet adv "från sydost" ;
åvdep adv "previously" ;
åvdebut adv ;
åvdålt adv "towards" ;
åvvdål adv ;
åvvdål+Use/NG:åvvdåla adv ;
åvvdålist adv "from in front" ;
åvvdålin adv "in the front" ;
åvvdålij adv "towards the front" ;

ädasik adv  "åtminstone" ;
älu adv "ofta" ;
älu+Use/NG:álo adv "ofta" ;
änj adv "still, yet" ;
ässká adv "äntligen, nyss, nu först, då först" ;
ässki adv ;
